Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 8. Pardons and Reprieves

Cross references. —

As to pardoning power of governor, see art. 4, § 5, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d Pardon and Parole § 1 et seq.

Pardon as restoring eligibility to public office, 58 ALR3d 1191.

67A C.J.S. Pardons §§ 32, 33.

§ 7-13-801.
Application for reprieve; conditions; acceptance and filing.

An application for a reprieve shall be made to the governor and shall contain:

The name of the person seeking the reprieve;

The offense for which he was convicted;

The date and place of the conviction;

The sentence imposed;

The sentence served;

Any subsequent arrests, criminal charges, convictions or sentences; and

Any other pertinent information the governor may request.

The governor’s warrant granting a reprieve shall list any conditions upon which the reprieve is granted. The person accepting the reprieve shall agree in writing to any conditions contained in the warrant.

The warrant of reprieve with the acceptance signed by the person granted the reprieve shall be filed with the clerk of the sentencing court as a part of the record in the case.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 202; R.S. 1887, § 3364; R.S. 1899, § 5455; C.S. 1910, § 555; C.S. 1920, § 645; R.S. 1931, § 80-201; C.S. 1945, § 11-201; W.S. 1957, § 7-379; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to suspension or respite of death sentence, see §

7-13-910

.

Trial court erred in granting presentence confinement credit against life sentence

when it had imposed a life sentence for murder and two five-to-ten-year sentences, each to be served concurrently, for drug conspiracy and aggravated assault and battery convictions, but consecutive to the life sentence. The defendant was entitled to credit upon that sentence which would be a benefit to him if he should ever reach a circumstance where the credit could be utilized for his release from confinement; that is, the credit should have been applied to the five-to-ten-year sentences and not against time which he could have served under the life sentence or any commuted term to which it could have been reduced. Weldon v. State, 800 P.2d 513,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

§ 7-13-802.
Confinement of reprieved persons.

The governor may require as a condition of the reprieve that the person reprieved be confined in a state penal institution during the period of the reprieve.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 203; R.S. 1887, § 3365; R.S. 1899, § 5456; C.S. 1910, § 556; C.S. 1920, § 646; R.S. 1931, § 80-202; C.S. 1945, § 11-202; W.S. 1957, § 7-380; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming state penitentiary and Wyoming women's center, see §

25-1-201

.

§ 7-13-803.
Manner of applying for pardon.

Application for the pardon of any person convicted of a felony shall be made in the manner and under the restrictions prescribed in W.S.

7-13-803

through

7-13-806

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 205; R.S. 1887, § 3367; R.S. 1899, § 5458; C.S. 1910, § 558; C.S. 1920, § 648; R.S. 1931, § 80-204; C.S. 1945, § 11-204; W.S. 1957, § 7-382; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-804

; Laws 1981, ch. 161, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Provisions deemed directory. —

This section and §§

7-13-804

through

7-13-806

, regulating the manner of making application for pardon, are merely directory to the applicants, and do not limit discretion of the governor to grant pardons to cases where application is made as herein provided; nor is their effect enlarged by art. 4, § 5, Wyo. Const., providing that governor pardons, but legislature may by law regulate the manner of application. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to notice and hearing before revocation of parole or conditional pardon, 29 ALR2d 1074, 44 ALR3d 306.

Effect of pardon for prior conviction as precluding its consideration under statute imposing higher penalty for subsequent offense, 31 ALR2d 1186.

Offenses and convictions covered by pardon, 35 ALR2d 1261.

Coverage of pardon as affected by pardoning power of official issuing pardon, 35 ALR2d 1261.

Pardon as preventing or nullifying removal of officer, 70 ALR2d 268.

Pardon as restoring license or eligibility for public office, 58 ALR3d 1191.

State restoration of federal felon's civil rights as nullification of conviction under 18 USC § 921(a)(20) which defines conviction for purposes of penalizing possession of weapon by convicted felon pursuant to 18 USC § 922(g)(1), 117 ALR Fed 247.

§ 7-13-804.
Contents of application for pardon; notice to district attorney.

A person convicted of a felony may apply to the governor for a pardon. The application shall contain:

The name of the person seeking the pardon;

The offense for which he was convicted;

The date and place of the conviction;

The sentence imposed;

The sentence served;

Any subsequent arrests, criminal charges, convictions or sentences; and

Any pertinent information the governor may request such as parole and community correctional program records.

The governor shall give notice of the application to the district attorney of the county in which the applicant was indicted or informed against at least three (3) weeks before the application is considered by the governor.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 206; R.S. 1887, § 3368; R.S. 1899, § 5459; C.S. 1910, § 559; C.S. 1920, § 649; R.S. 1931, § 80-205; C.S. 1945, § 11-205; W.S. 1957, § 7-383; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-805

; Laws 1981, ch. 161, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2014 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(vii), substituted “community correctional program”
for “work release.”

Cited

in

In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1893).

§ 7-13-805.
Statement of district attorney following notice of pardon application.

Within ten (10) days after receiving the notice required by W.S. 7-13-804(b), the district attorney for the county in which the applicant was indicted or informed against shall forward to the governor a statement setting forth the time of the trial and conviction, the date and term of the sentence, the crime of which the person was convicted and any circumstances in aggravation or extenuation which appeared in the trial and sentencing of the person.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 207; R.S. 1887, § 3369; R.S. 1899, § 5460; C.S. 1910, § 560; C.S. 1920, § 650; R.S. 1931, § 80-206; C.S. 1945, § 11-206; W.S. 1957, § 7-384; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-806

; Laws 1981, ch. 161, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cited

in

In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1893).

§ 7-13-806.
Certification that applicant for pardon in danger of death.

When a physician certifies to the governor that the applicant for pardon is in imminent danger of death and the department of corrections recommends to the governor that the person be pardoned, the requirements of W.S.

7-13-803

through

7-13-805

do not apply.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 208; R.S. 1887, § 3370; R.S. 1899, § 5461; C.S. 1910, § 561; C.S. 1920, § 651; R.S. 1931, § 80-207; C.S. 1945, § 11-207; W.S. 1957, § 7-385; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-807

; Laws 1981, ch. 161, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Cited

in

In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1893).

§ 7-13-807.
Commutation of death sentences.

Pursuant to article 3, section 53 of the Wyoming constitution, a death sentence may be commuted to a sentence of life imprisonment without parole but that sentence shall not be subject to further commutation.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 96, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the penalty and sentencing for murder in the first degree, see §

6-2-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation of order commuting state criminal sentence, 88 ALR5th 463.